Maryland, session 2025, SB0975.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–847.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) (i) “Specialty drug” means a prescription drug that:
1. is prescribed for an individual with a complex or chronic
medical condition or a rare medical condition;
2. costs $600 or more for up to a 30–day supply;
– 1 –

Ch. 728 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. is not typically stocked at retail pharmacies; and
4. A. requires a difficult or unusual process of delivery to
the patient in the preparation, handling, storage, inventory, or distribution of the drug; or
B. requires enhanced patient education, management, or
support, beyond those required for traditional dispensing, before or after administration of
the drug.
(ii) “Specialty drug” does not include a prescription drug prescribed
to treat diabetes, HIV, or AIDS.
(d) Subject to SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION AND § 15–805 of this subtitle
[and], notwithstanding § 15–806 of this subtitle, [nothing in] AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED
IN § 15–847.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE, this article or regulations adopted under this article
[precludes] DO NOT PRECLUDE an entity subject to this section from requiring a covered
specialty drug to be obtained through:
(1) a designated pharmacy or other source authorized under the Health
Occupations Article to dispense or administer prescription drugs; or
(2) a pharmacy participating in the entity’s provider network, if the entity
determines that the pharmacy:
(i) meets the entity’s performance standards; and
(ii) accepts the entity’s network reimbursement rates.
(H) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO SUPERSEDE THE AUTHORITY
OF THE HEALTH SERVICES COST REVIEW COMMISSION TO SET RATES FOR
SPECIALTY DRUGS ADMINISTERED TO PATIENTS IN A SETTING REGULATED BY THE
HEALTH SERVICES COST REVIEW COMMISSION.
15–847.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SPECIALTY DRUG” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
15–847 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(I) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS UNDER INDIVIDUAL, GROUP, OR
BLANKET HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR
DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 728
(II) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS UNDER INDIVIDUAL OR GROUP CONTRACTS
THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(2) AN INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION
DRUGS THROUGH A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER IS SUBJECT TO THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT EXCLUDE COVERAGE
FOR A COVERED SPECIALTY DRUG ADMINISTERED OR DISPENSED BY A PROVIDER
UNDER § 12–102 OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE IF THE ENTITY
DETERMINES THAT:
(1) THE PROVIDER THAT ADMINISTERS OR DISPENSES THE COVERED
SPECIALTY DRUG:
(I) IS AN IN–NETWORK PROVIDER OF COVERED MEDICAL
ONCOLOGY SERVICES; AND
(II) COMPLIES WITH STATE REGULATIONS FOR THE
ADMINISTERING AND DISPENSING OF SPECIALTY DRUGS; AND
(2) THE COVERED SPECIALTY DRUG IS:
(I) INFUSED, AUTO–INJECTED, OR AN ORAL TARGETED
IMMUNE MODULATOR; OR
(II) AN ORAL MEDICATION THAT:
1. REQUIRES COMPLEX DOSING BASED ON CLINICAL
PRESENTATION; OR
2. IS USED CONCOMITANTLY WITH OTHER INFUSION OR
RADIATION THERAPIES.
(D) (1) THE SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, THE
REIMBURSEMENT RATE FOR SPECIALTY DRUGS COVERED UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE:
(1) (I) AGREED TO BY THE COVERED, IN–NETWORK PROVIDER AND
THE ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 728 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) (II) BILLED AT A NONHOSPITAL LEVEL OF CARE OR PLACE OF
SERVICE.
(2) UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED TO BY THE COVERED, IN–NETWORK
PROVIDER AND THE ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION, THE REIMBURSEMENT RATE
FOR SPECIALTY DRUGS COVERED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT EXCEED THE RATE
APPLICABLE TO A DESIGNATED SPECIALTY PHARMACY FOR DISPENSING THE
COVERED SPECIALTY DRUGS.
(E) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS
SECTION FROM REFUSING TO AUTHORIZE OR APPROVE OR FROM DENYING
COVERAGE FOR A COVERED SPECIALTY DRUG ADMINISTERED OR DISPENSED BY A
PROVIDER IF ADMINISTERING OR DISPENSING THE DRUG FAILS TO SATISFY
MEDICAL NECESSITY CRITERIA.
(F) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO SUPERSEDE THE AUTHORITY
OF THE HEALTH SERVICES COST REVIEW COMMISSION TO SET RATES FOR
SPECIALTY DRUGS ADMINISTERED TO PATIENTS IN A SETTING REGULATED BY THE
HEALTH SERVICES COST REVIEW COMMISSION.
15–1611.1.
(a) This section applies only to a pharmacy benefits manager that provides
pharmacy benefits management services on behalf of a carrier.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a pharmacy benefits
manager may not require that a beneficiary use a specific pharmacy or entity to fill a
prescription if:
(1) the pharmacy benefits manager or a corporate affiliate of the pharmacy
benefits manager has an ownership interest in the pharmacy or entity; or
(2) the pharmacy or entity has an ownership interest in the pharmacy
benefits manager or a corporate affiliate of the pharmacy benefits manager.
(c) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 15–847.2 OF THIS TITLE, A pharmacy
benefits manager may require a beneficiary to use a specific pharmacy or entity for a
specialty drug as defined in § 15–847 of this title.
15–1612.
(a) This section applies only to a pharmacy benefits manager that provides
pharmacy benefits management services on behalf of a carrier.
(b) This section does not apply to reimbursement:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 728
(1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 15–847.2 OF THIS TITLE, for specialty
drugs;
(2) for mail order drugs; or
(3) to a chain pharmacy with more than 15 stores or a pharmacist who is
an employee of the chain pharmacy.
(c) A pharmacy benefits manager may not reimburse a pharmacy or pharmacist
for a pharmaceutical product or pharmacist service in an amount less than the amount that
the pharmacy benefits manager reimburses itself or an affiliate for providing the same
product or service.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 5 –